Wyoming, session 2026, HB0013.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 33-24-159 is created to read:

33-24-159. Ivermectin without prescription or
consultation with a health care professional.

HB0013

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0036
(a) As used in this section, "over-the-counter
medication" means a medication that may be legally sold and
purchased without a prescription.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, ivermectin that is
suitable for human use or consumption may be sold or
purchased as an over-the-counter medication in this state
without a prescription or consultation with a health care
professional. For purposes of this section, ivermectin
shall not be:

(i) Designated as a dangerous substance under
W.S. 33-24-126;

(ii) Deemed as having a depressant or stimulant
effect on the central nervous system, habit-forming,
hallucinogenic or otherwise needing the supervision of a
practitioner under W.S. 33-24-131.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0013